Georgia, session 2025_26, SB244.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 1 of Chapter 11 of Title 17 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
general provisions regarding the assessment and payment of costs of criminal proceedings,
is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"17-11-6.
(a) In the event, based upon a motion by the defendant in a felony or misdemeanor
criminal case, that the prosecuting attorney in such case is disqualified due to improper
S. B. 244
- 1 -

SB 244/FA
conduct on the part of such prosecuting attorney, the defendant shall be entitled to an award
of reasonable costs and attorney's fees in the case.
(b) If the disqualification of the prosecuting attorney results in the criminal case being
dismissed against the defendant who filed the motion for disqualification due to improper
conduct, the defendant who filed the motion for disqualification shall be entitled to an
award of all reasonable attorney's fees and costs incurred by the defendant in defending the
case.
(c) The defendant who filed a successful motion for disqualification of a prosecuting
attorney based upon the misconduct of such prosecuting attorney shall file a motion for
reasonable attorney's fees and costs upon the termination of the underlying criminal case.
The judge to whom the criminal case was assigned shall consider such motion for
reasonable attorney's fees and costs and shall award such reasonable attorney's fees and
costs as provided under this Code section to such defendant.
(d) Attorney's fees and costs awarded under this Code section shall be paid from the
treasury of the county in which such criminal case was brought."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 244
- 2 -